District of Columbia statutes.
50-1904

Availability of chemical test results.

Full information concerning the chemical test results administered under this chapter, including records as provided in § 5-1501.06, shall be made available to the person from whom specimens were obtained pursuant to Rule 16 of the District of Columbia Superior Court Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1017, Pub. L. 92-519, § 4
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(c)(4), 59 DCR 12957

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-504.
1973 Ed., § 40-1004.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 rewrote this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(c)(4) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see § 101(d)(1) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary codification of §§ 50-1905 to 50-1907 as subchapter II of this chapter, see § 101(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(c)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).